Hawaii statutes.
§291E-6 Ignition interlock devices;
certification. (a) The director of transportation shall establish and
administer a statewide program relating to certification and monitoring of
ignition interlock devices installed pursuant to chapter 291E and shall select
a single vendor to install and maintain them.

(b) The program shall include standards and
procedures for the certification of ignition interlock devices installed
pursuant to chapter 291E. At a minimum, the standards shall require that the
devices:

(1) Be certified by an independent laboratory to meet
or exceed the guidelines published by the National Highway Traffic Safety
Administration;

(2) Operate using an alcohol-specific sensor
technology;

(3) Employ a digital camera by which a photograph of
the person using the device can be incorporated into the electronic record
generated by each use of the device;

(4) Require a rolling retest by which the driver
must, within a specified period of time or distance driven after starting the
vehicle, be retested and found to have an alcohol concentration of less than
.02, with a margin of error of .01; and

(5) Generate a record of vehicle usage, including
dates and times driven.

(c) The program shall include standards and
procedures for the certification of the vendor selected to install and maintain
ignition interlock devices pursuant to chapter 291E. At a minimum, the
standards shall require that the vendor:

(1) Install only an ignition interlock device that is
certified pursuant to this section;

(2) Offer or contract for ignition interlock device
installation and maintenance statewide;

(3) Train drivers who are required to install an
ignition interlock device, pursuant to chapter 291E, in how to use the device;

(4) Schedule the driver for all necessary readings
and maintenance of the device; and

(5) Provide periodic reports regarding the use of
each ignition interlock device installed pursuant to chapter 291E, including
incidents of test failure, attempts to circumvent the device, and dates, times,
and distances the vehicle was driven.

(d) The vendor selected for installation and
maintenance of ignition interlock devices pursuant to chapter 291E shall be
audited annually by the director of transportation pursuant to this section and
the rules adopted thereunder. The director of transportation may require the
vendor to pay for all or part of the costs incurred in conducting the audit.

(e) The director of transportation shall adopt
rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purposes of this section. [L
2008, c 171, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 88, §§3, 13, 17(2); am L 2010, c 4, §3 and
c 166, §8; am L 2012, c 327, §8]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next